Wisconsin, session 2025, AB472.
do enact as follows:AB472,11Section 1. 1.12 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB472,2,621.12 (3) (b) Renewable and nuclear energy resources. It is the goal of the state 3that, to the extent that it is cost-effective and technically feasible, all new installed 4capacity for electric generation in the state be based on renewable energy resources, 5including hydroelectric, wood, wind, solar, refuse, agricultural and biomass energy 6resources, or nuclear energy.AB472,27Section 2. 1.12 (4) (cm) of the statutes is renumbered 1.12 (4) (am).AB472,31Section 3. 1.12 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB472,3,721.12 (5) (a) In designing all new and replacement energy projects, a state 3agency or local governmental unit shall rely to the greatest extent feasible on 4energy efficiency improvements and renewable or nuclear energy resources, if the 5energy efficiency improvements and renewable or nuclear energy resources are 6cost-effective and technically feasible and do not have unacceptable environmental 7impacts.AB472,48Section 4. 16.75 (12) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB472,3,12916.75 (12) (a) 4. “Renewable Except as provided under par. (e), “renewable 10resource” has the meaning given in s. 196.378 (1) (h) 1. or 2. and includes a 11resource, as defined in s. 196.378 (1) (j), that derives electricity from hydroelectric 12power.AB472,513Section 5. 16.75 (12) (e) of the statutes is renumbered 16.75 (12) (e) 2.AB472,614Section 6. 16.75 (12) (e) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB472,3,161516.75 (12) (e) 1. Beginning in 2026, and only for purposes of the report under 16this paragraph, “renewable resources” also includes nuclear energy resources.AB472,717Section 7. 66.0627 (1) (bk) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB472,3,201866.0627 (1) (bk) 2. An improvement to a premises that allows for the small 19scale derivation of electricity from a renewable low-carbon-emission resource listed 20under described in s. 196.378 (1) (h) (em).AB472,821Section 8. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2215, is amended to read:AB472,4,42371.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 24(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5f), (5h), 1(5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a 2partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 3that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 4under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB472,95Section 9. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:AB472,4,7671.07 (12) Nuclear energy generation credit. (a) Definitions. In this 7subsection:AB472,4,881. “Applicable credit factor” means one of the following:AB472,4,119a. For each of the first 10 tax years for which a claimant claims a credit under 10this subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 11facility, $10,000.AB472,4,1412b. For the 11th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 13subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 14facility, $9,000.AB472,4,1715c. For the 12th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 16subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 17facility, $8,000.AB472,4,2018d. For the 13th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 19subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 20facility, $7,000.AB472,4,2321e. For the 14th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 22subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 23facility, $6,000.AB472,5,224f. For the 15th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 1subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 2facility, $5,000.AB472,5,53g. For the 16th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 4subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 5facility, $4,000.AB472,5,86h. For the 17th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 7subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 8facility, $3,000.AB472,5,119i. For the 18th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 10subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 11facility, $2,000.AB472,5,1412j. For the 19th tax year for which a claimant claims a credit under this 13subsection or under s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12) for a particular nuclear energy 14facility, $1,000.AB472,5,16152. “Capacity” means the nominal rated capacity of a nuclear energy facility 16measured in megawatts.AB472,5,18173. “Claimant” means a person that files a claim under this subsection and 18who is one of the following:AB472,5,1919a. An electric public utility.AB472,5,2020b. An electric cooperative organized under ch. 185.AB472,5,22214. “Nuclear energy facility” means electric generating equipment and 22associated facilities that derive electricity from nuclear power.AB472,6,323(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2029, a 24claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the 1amount of the tax, an amount equal to the capacity of the claimant’s nuclear energy 2facility multiplied by the applicable credit factor for the nuclear energy facility for 3the taxable year.AB472,6,64(c) Limitations. 1. No credit under this subsection may be claimed for a 5nuclear energy facility unless the facility is located in this state and the facility 6generated electricity during the tax year for which the credit is claimed. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab472 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab472 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB472 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB472 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB472: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting